incubator/sl-nouns.dix
    <pardef n="cilj__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>em</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ev</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ih</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ih</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sanj/a__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ah</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>am</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="obtožb/a__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ah</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="izvolit/ev__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ev</l>
          <r>ev<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ev</l>
          <r>ev<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ev</l>
          <r>ev<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ve</l>
          <r>ev<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vi</l>
          <r>ev<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="skript/a__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="panog/a__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ah</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="storil/ec__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ce</l>
          <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cev</l>
          <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ci</l>
          <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="trak__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ove</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ovih</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ovi</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ovi</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ov</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>/stroj</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="izvolitev"><i>izvolit</i><par n="izvolit/ev__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="trak"><i>trak</i><par n="trak__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="razglasitev"><i>razglasit</i><par n="izvolit/ev__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="okvir"><i>okvir</i><par n="cilj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="panoga"><i>panog</i><par n="panog/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="nosečnica"><i>nosečnic</i><par n="sanj/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="predložitev"><i>predložit</i><par n="izvolit/ev__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="telekomunikacija"><i>telekomunikacij</i><par n="panog/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="intervencija"><i>intervencij</i><par n="panog/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="skripta"><i>skript</i><par n="skript/a__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="cilj"><i>cilj</i><par n="cilj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="obtožba"><i>obtožb</i><par n="obtožb/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="sanja"><i>sanj</i><par n="sanj/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="storilec"><i>storil</i><par n="storil/ec__n_m"/></e>
